gagauz.foma
!!! gagauz.foma !!!

define Vowels [ a | e | ê | ä | i | ı | o | ö | u | ü | і];

define Consonants [ b | c | ç | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | r | s | ş | ș | t | ţ | ț | v | y | z];

define Nasalcons [n | m];

define HardVowels [a | e | ê | ä | i | ı | o | ö | u | ü | і];

define SoftVowels [e | ä | i | ö | ü | і]; 

define RoundVowels [o | ö | u | ü];

read lexc gagauz.lexc
define Lexicon;


#{L} changed to n when after a Nasal consonant
define LDeletion l -> n || Nasalcons "^" _ ;

#s become 0 when intervocalic
define Sdeletion s -> 0 || Vowels _ Vowels;

# Deletion of i after surface level Vowels 
define DeletionI i -> 0 || Vowels "^" _ ;

#Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

read lexc gagauz.lexc
define Lexicon

define Grammar Lexicon .o. LDeletion .o. Sdeletion .o. DeletionI .o.  Cleanup;

regex Grammar;
